src/morphology/affixes/verbs.lexc
! ====================================== !
!! !!!Verbal morphology               
! ====================================== !

LEXICON Verbs
verb    V_   ;
verbs ; 

LEXICON V_
+WORK: # ;

!! !!Closed class verbs
! ------------------

LEXICON VERBNEGATIVE
!Present Neg
оз+V+Neg+Ind+Prs+Sg1:ог MatrixVerb-Comparison ;
оз+V+Neg+Ind+Prs+Sg2:он MatrixVerb-Comparison ;
оз+V+Neg+Ind+Prs+Sg3:оз MatrixVerb-Comparison ;
оз+V+Neg+Ind+Prs+Pl1:огӧ MatrixVerb-Comparison ;
оз+V+Neg+Ind+Prs+Pl2:онӧ MatrixVerb-Comparison ;
оз+V+Neg+Ind+Prs+Pl1:огӧй MatrixVerb-Comparison ;
оз+V+Neg+Ind+Prs+Pl2:онӧй MatrixVerb-Comparison ;
оз+V+Neg+Ind+Prs+Pl3:озӧ MatrixVerb-Comparison ;


!Past Neg
оз+V+Neg+Ind+Prt+Sg1:эг MatrixVerb-Comparison ;
оз+V+Neg+Ind+Prt+Sg2:эн MatrixVerb-Comparison ;
оз+V+Neg+Ind+Prt+Sg3:эз MatrixVerb-Comparison ;
оз+V+Neg+Ind+Prt+Pl1:эг MatrixVerb-Comparison ;
оз+V+Neg+Ind+Prt+Pl2:эн MatrixVerb-Comparison ;
оз+V+Neg+Ind+Prt+Pl1:эгӧ MatrixVerb-Comparison ;
оз+V+Neg+Ind+Prt+Pl2:энӧ MatrixVerb-Comparison ;
оз+V+Neg+Ind+Prt+Pl3:эзӧ MatrixVerb-Comparison ;

!Imperative
оз+V+Neg+Imprt+Sg2:эн K ;
оз+V+Neg+Imprt+Pl2:эн K ;
оз+V+Neg+Imprt+Pl2:энӧ K ;
!A tag is needed to indicate this clitic-like лы segment
оз+V+Neg+Imprt+Sg2:энлы K ;

!Final
моз+V+Neg+Final+1:мог K ; ! мед ог _so that I/we won't_
моз+V+Neg+Final+2:мон K ; ! мед он
моз+V+Neg+Final+3:моз K ; ! мед оз




!! !!Open class verbs
! ----------------

!! Some Flag diacritic lines are with regexes, other with aligned zeros. We want to migrate to
!! regexes < … > , for readability reasons (sic!)

LEXICON V_LOKNY !!≈ * __@CODE@__ One verb only, локны:лок
+V+Inf0@U.CONJ-INF.YES@:%>ны@U.CONJ-INF.YES@ VerbEnd-Comparison ;
+V+Inf+Px10@U.CONJ-INF.YES@@U.CONJ-POSS.1@:%>ным@U.CONJ-INF.YES@@U.CONJ-POSS.1@ VerbEnd-Comparison ;
+V+Inf+Px20@U.CONJ-INF.YES@@U.CONJ-POSS.2@:%>ныт@U.CONJ-INF.YES@@U.CONJ-POSS.2@ VerbEnd-Comparison ;
+V+Inf+Px30@U.CONJ-INF.YES@@U.CONJ-POSS.3@:%>ныс@U.CONJ-INF.YES@@U.CONJ-POSS.3@ VerbEnd-Comparison ;
+V+Inf+Px2+Acc0@U.CONJ-INF.YES@@U.CONJ-POSS.2ACC@:%>нытӧ@U.CONJ-INF.YES@@U.CONJ-POSS.2ACC@ VerbEnd-Comparison ;
+V+Inf+Px3+Acc0@U.CONJ-INF.YES@@U.CONJ-POSS.3ACC@:%>нысӧ@U.CONJ-INF.YES@@U.CONJ-POSS.3ACC@ VerbEnd-Comparison ;
+V+ConNeg+Pl3@U.CONJ-INF.NO@@U.CONJ-CONNEG.YES@@U.CONJ-NX.PL@@U.CONJ-PX.3@:%>ны@U.CONJ-INF.NO@@U.CONJ-CONNEG.YES@@U.CONJ-NX.PL@@U.CONJ-PX.3@ VerbEnd ;
+V+ConNeg@U.CONJ-INF.NO@@U.CONJ-CONNEG.YES@:00@U.CONJ-INF.NO@@U.CONJ-CONNEG.YES@ VerbEnd ;
+V+Imprt+Sg2@U.CONJ-INF.NO@@U.CONJ-MX.IMP@@U.CONJ-NX.SG@@U.CONJ-PX.2@:000@U.CONJ-INF.NO@@U.CONJ-MX.IMP@@U.CONJ-NX.SG@@U.CONJ-PX.2@ VerbEnd ;
+V0@U.CONJ-INF.YES@:%>т@U.CONJ-INF.YES@ VerbDer_KUTNY ; !
+V0@U.CONJ-INF.YES@:%>т@U.CONJ-INF.YES@ VerbDer-V ; !
+V:т  VerbConj_KUTNY ; !а


LEXICON VR_SHUNY !!≈ * __@CODE@__ 
+V+Refl@U.CONJ-INF.YES@:00@U.CONJ-INF.YES@ Verb-nyDer ; !
+V+Refl@U.CONJ-INF.YES@:00@U.CONJ-INF.YES@ VerbDer ; !
+V+Refl@U.CONJ-INF.YES@:00@U.CONJ-INF.YES@ VerbDer-V ; !
+V+Refl: VerbConj ; !а
+V+Refl: VerbConj-V ; !б

LEXICON V_SHUNY !!≈ * __@CODE@__ шуны:шу янӧдны, контролируйтны. Ending in -дны, -тны, -Cны, -Vны.
+V@U.CONJ-INF.YES@:0@U.CONJ-INF.YES@ Verb-nyDer ; !
+V@U.CONJ-INF.YES@:0@U.CONJ-INF.YES@ VerbDer ; !
+V@U.CONJ-INF.YES@:0@U.CONJ-INF.YES@ VerbDer-V ; !
+V: VerbConj ; !а
+V: VerbConj-V ; !б

LEXICON V_JUAYSHNY !!≈ * __@CODE@__ is there ш : шт gradation
 V_AMNY ; 
LEXICON VR_AMNY !!≈ * __@CODE@__
+V+Refl@U.CONJ-INF.YES@:00@U.CONJ-INF.YES@ Verb-nyDer ; !
+V+Refl@U.CONJ-INF.YES@:00@U.CONJ-INF.YES@ VerbDer ; !
+V+Refl@U.CONJ-INF.YES@:00@U.CONJ-INF.YES@ VerbDer-V ; !
+V+Refl: VerbConj_AMNY ; !а
+V+Refl: VerbConj-V ; !б

LEXICON V_AMNY !!≈ * __@CODE@__ амны:ам Ending in -мны, -жны, -дзны,
+V@U.CONJ-INF.YES@:0@U.CONJ-INF.YES@ Verb-nyDer ; !
+V@U.CONJ-INF.YES@:0@U.CONJ-INF.YES@ VerbDer ; !
+V@U.CONJ-INF.YES@:0@U.CONJ-INF.YES@ VerbDer-V ; !
+V: VerbConj_AMNY ; !а
+V: VerbConj-V ; !б

LEXICON VR_KYJNY !!≈ * __@CODE@__ 
+V+Refl@U.CONJ-INF.YES@:й0@U.CONJ-INF.YES@ Verb-nyDer-ONSET-CONS ; !
+V+Refl@U.CONJ-INF.YES@:й0@U.CONJ-INF.YES@ Verb-nyDer-ONSET-Y ; !
+V+Refl@U.CONJ-INF.YES@:00@U.CONJ-INF.YES@ Verb-nyDer-ONSET-JA ; !
+V+Refl@U.CONJ-INF.YES@:00@U.CONJ-INF.YES@ VerbDer_KYJNY ; !
+V+Refl@U.CONJ-INF.YES@:00@U.CONJ-INF.YES@ VerbDer-V ; !
+V+Refl: VerbConj_KYJNY ; !а
+V+Refl:й VerbConj-V ; !б

LEXICON V_KYJNY !!≈ * __@CODE@__ кыйны:кы Ending in -йны, 
+V@U.CONJ-INF.YES@:й@U.CONJ-INF.YES@ Verb-nyDer-ONSET-CONS ; !
+V@U.CONJ-INF.YES@:й@U.CONJ-INF.YES@ Verb-nyDer-ONSET-Y ; !
+V@U.CONJ-INF.YES@:0@U.CONJ-INF.YES@ Verb-nyDer-ONSET-JA ; !
+V@U.CONJ-INF.YES@:0@U.CONJ-INF.YES@ VerbDer_KYJNY ; !
+V@U.CONJ-INF.YES@:й@U.CONJ-INF.YES@ VerbDer-V ; !
+V: VerbConj_KYJNY ; !а
+V:й VerbConj-V ; !б

LEXICON V_CHILOESNY !!≈ * __@CODE@__ is there s : st alternation 2018-09-01
 V_KUTNY ;

LEXICON VR_KUTNY !!≈ * __@CODE@__
+V+Refl@U.CONJ-INF.YES@:00@U.CONJ-INF.YES@ Verb-nyDer ; !
+V+Refl@U.CONJ-INF.YES@:00@U.CONJ-INF.YES@ VerbDer_KUTNY ; !
+V+Refl@U.CONJ-INF.YES@:00@U.CONJ-INF.YES@ VerbDer-V ; !
+V+Refl: VerbConj_KUTNY ; !а
+V+Refl: VerbConj-V ; !б

LEXICON V_KUTNY !!≈ * __@CODE@__ шуны:шу янӧдны, контролируйтны. Ending in -дны, -тны, -Cны, -Vны.
+V@U.CONJ-INF.YES@:0@U.CONJ-INF.YES@ Verb-nyDer ; !
+V@U.CONJ-INF.YES@:0@U.CONJ-INF.YES@ VerbDer_KUTNY ; !
+V@U.CONJ-INF.YES@:0@U.CONJ-INF.YES@ VerbDer-V ; !
+V: VerbConj_KUTNY ; !а
+V: VerbConj-V ; !б

LEXICON VR_NUAVNY !!≈ * __@CODE@__ нуавны:нуа
+V+Refl@U.CONJ-INF.YES@:в0@U.CONJ-INF.YES@ Verb-nyDer-ONSET-CONS ; !
+V+Refl@U.CONJ-INF.YES@:л0@U.CONJ-INF.YES@ Verb-nyDer-ONSET-VOW ; !
+V+Refl@U.CONJ-INF.YES@:л0@U.CONJ-INF.YES@ VerbDer_KUTNY ; !
+V+Refl@U.CONJ-INF.YES@:в0@U.CONJ-INF.YES@ VerbDer-V ; !
+V+Refl:л VerbConj_KUTNY ; !а
+V+Refl:в VerbConj-V ; !б

LEXICON V_NUAVNY !!≈ * __@CODE@__ нуавны:нуа
+V@U.CONJ-INF.YES@:в@U.CONJ-INF.YES@ Verb-nyDer-ONSET-CONS ; !
+V@U.CONJ-INF.YES@:л@U.CONJ-INF.YES@ Verb-nyDer-ONSET-VOW ; !
+V@U.CONJ-INF.YES@:л@U.CONJ-INF.YES@ VerbDer_KUTNY ; !
+V@U.CONJ-INF.YES@:в@U.CONJ-INF.YES@ VerbDer-V ; !
+V:л VerbConj_KUTNY ; !а
+V:в VerbConj-V ; !! Consonant-onset

LEXICON VR_ARTASJNY !!≈ * __@CODE@__
+V+Refl@U.CONJ-INF.YES@:ь0@U.CONJ-INF.YES@ Verb-nyDer-ONSET-CONS ; !
+V+Refl@U.CONJ-INF.YES@:ь0@U.CONJ-INF.YES@ Verb-nyDer-ONSET-Y ; !
+V+Refl@U.CONJ-INF.YES@:00@U.CONJ-INF.YES@ Verb-nyDer-ONSET-JA ; !
+V+Refl@U.CONJ-INF.YES@:00@U.CONJ-INF.YES@ VerbDer_ARTASJNY ; !
+V+Refl@U.CONJ-INF.YES@:ь0@U.CONJ-INF.YES@ VerbDer-V ; !
+V+Refl: VerbConj ; !а
+V+Refl: VerbConj-V ; !б

LEXICON V_ARTASJNY !!≈ * __@CODE@__ артасьны:артас -Cны.
+V@U.CONJ-INF.YES@:ь@U.CONJ-INF.YES@ Verb-nyDer ; !
+V@U.CONJ-INF.YES@:0@U.CONJ-INF.YES@ VerbDer_ARTASJNY ; !
+V@U.CONJ-INF.YES@:ь@U.CONJ-INF.YES@ VerbDer-V ; !
+V: VerbConj ; !а
+V: VerbConj-V ; !б

LEXICON VR_LYDDJYNY !!≈ * __@CODE@__ 
+V+Refl@U.CONJ-INF.YES@:00@U.CONJ-INF.YES@ Verb-ynyDer ; !
+V+Refl@U.CONJ-INF.YES@:00@U.CONJ-INF.YES@ VerbDer ; !
+V+Refl@U.CONJ-INF.YES@:ы0@U.CONJ-INF.YES@ VerbDer-V ; !
+V+Refl: VerbConj ; ! check this!!!
+V+Refl:ы VerbConj-V ; ! check this!!!

LEXICON V_LYDDJYNY !!≈ * __@CODE@__ лыддьыны:лыддь ! ярмыны. Multiple-syllable verb ending in -ыны.
+V@U.CONJ-INF.YES@:0@U.CONJ-INF.YES@ Verb-ynyDer ; !
+V@U.CONJ-INF.YES@:0@U.CONJ-INF.YES@ VerbDer ; !
+V@U.CONJ-INF.YES@:ы@U.CONJ-INF.YES@ VerbDer-V ; !
+V: VerbConj ; ! check this!!!
+V:ы VerbConj-V ; ! check this!!!

LEXICON VR_VOLYNY !!≈ * __@CODE@__ 
+V+Refl@U.CONJ-INF.YES@:00@U.CONJ-INF.YES@ Verb-ynyDer ; !
+V+Refl@U.CONJ-INF.YES@:00@U.CONJ-INF.YES@ VerbDer_KUTNY ; !
+V+Refl@U.CONJ-INF.YES@:ы0@U.CONJ-INF.YES@ VerbDer-V ; !
+V+Refl: VerbConj_KUTNY ; ! check this!!!
+V+Refl:ы VerbConj-V ; ! check this!!!
