src/morphology/stems/verbs.lexc
LEXICON verbs
айда:айда V_  "" ;
бельявны:белья V_NUAVNY  "" ;
быгзьӧтны:быгзьӧт V_KUTNY  "" ;
бытшкисьны:бытшкись V_ARTASJNY  "" ;
вайны:ва V_KYJNY  "" ;
вамны:вам V_AMNY  "" ;
вапсыравны:вапсыра V_NUAVNY  "" ;
ветлӧтлыны:ветвӧтвы V_LYDDJYNY  "" ;
ветлӧтны:ветлӧт V_KUTNY  "" ;
вийны:ви V_KYJNY  "" ;
вожжиавны:вожжиа V_NUAVNY  "" ;
волысасьны:волысась V_ARTASJNY  "" ;
воны+Hom1:во V_SHUNY  "" ;
воны+Hom2:во V_SHUNY  "" ;
вочны:воч V_AMNY  "" ;
вугралыштны:вуграыш V_JUAYSHNY  "" ;
вӧйны:вӧ V_KYJNY  "" ;
вӧйны:вӧ V_KYJNY  "" ;
вӧрзьӧтчыштны:вӧрзьӧтчышт V_KUTNY  "" ;
вӧчны:вӧч V_AMNY  "" ;
вӧявны:вӧя V_NUAVNY  "" ;
гогышасьны:гогышась V_ARTASJNY  "" ;
горалӧв-керны:гораӧв-кер V_AMNY  "" ;
гыжтыны:гыжты V_LYDDJYNY  "" ;
гырдӧтны:гырдӧт V_KUTNY  "" ;
дзирдамны:дзирдам V_AMNY  "" ;
дзоридзасьны:дзоридзась V_ARTASJNY  "" ;
дзорсявны:дзорся V_NUAVNY  "" ;
дӧваавны:дӧваал V_KUTNY  "" ;
зудъясьны:зудъясь V_ARTASJNY  "" ;
зэлӧтчывны:зэлӧтчы V_NUAVNY  "" ;
иньтӧдны:иньтӧд V_KUTNY  "" ;
казьмӧтлыны:казьмӧтлы V_LYDDJYNY  "" ;
кайны:ка V_KYJNY  "" ;
кежны:кеж V_AMNY  "" ;
кеслыштны:кесвыш V_JUAYSHNY  "" ;
кизясьны:кизясь V_ARTASJNY  "" ;
койны+Hom1:ко V_KYJNY  "" ;
койны+Hom2:ко V_KYJNY  "" ;
колассьӧтны:колассьӧт V_KUTNY  "" ;
кольттявны:кольття V_NUAVNY  "" ;
кошшӧв-керны:кошшӧл-кер V_AMNY  "" ;
крюкасьны:крюкась V_ARTASJNY  "" ;
куслыны:кусвы V_LYDDJYNY  "" ;
кутыштны:кутышт V_KUTNY  "" ;
кыйны:кы V_KYJNY  "" ;
кыйны:кы V_KYJNY  "" ;
кышасьны:кышась V_ARTASJNY  "" ;
кӧбны:кӧб V_AMNY  "" ;
кӧртмавны:кӧртма V_NUAVNY  "" ;
лойны:ло V_KYJNY  "" ;
лойны:во V_KYJNY  "" ;
лолалыштны:воаыш V_JUAYSHNY  "" ;
лоны:ло V_SHUNY  "" ;
лоны:во V_SHUNY  "" ;
лыйны:лы V_KYJNY  "" ;
лыйны:вы V_KYJNY  "" ;
лыйсьӧв-керны:выйсьӧв-кер V_AMNY  "" ;
лэдзлыны:ведзвы V_LYDDJYNY  "" ;
лэдзны:лэдз V_AMNY  "" ;
ляпкисьны:ляпкись V_ARTASJNY  "" ;
лёкшӧртны:лёкшӧрт V_KUTNY  "" ;
лӧньыштны:вӧньыш V_JUAYSHNY  "" ;
мичамны:мичам V_AMNY  "" ;
мургылявны:мургыля V_NUAVNY  "" ;
мышкырасьны:мышкырась V_ARTASJNY  "" ;
на:на V_  "" ;
нуны:ну V_SHUNY  "" ;
нуӧтлыны:нуӧтлы V_LYDDJYNY  "" ;
ны V_SHUNY  "" ;
ны V_SHUNY  "" ;
нюкыштны:нюкышт V_KUTNY  "" ;
нярьясьны:нярьясь V_ARTASJNY  "" ;
нёкравны:нёкра V_NUAVNY  "" ;
олыштны:оыш V_JUAYSHNY  "" ;
олӧв-керны:оӧв-кер V_AMNY  "" ;
панлыштны:панвыш V_JUAYSHNY  "" ;
пантасьны:пантась V_ARTASJNY  "" ;
панӧвтлыны:панӧлтлы V_LYDDJYNY  "" ;
перйыштны:перйышт V_KUTNY  "" ;
перытсявны:перытся V_NUAVNY  "" ;
пиньласьыштны:пиньвасьыш V_JUAYSHNY  "" ;
письтасьны:письтась V_ARTASJNY  "" ;
польдывлыны:польдывлы V_LYDDJYNY  "" ;
поперёгалыштны:поперёгавыш V_JUAYSHNY  "" ;
пукавны:пука V_NUAVNY  "" ;
пуны:пу V_SHUNY  "" ;
путшасьыштны:путшасьышт V_KUTNY  "" ;
пызйисьны:пызйись V_ARTASJNY  "" ;
пыкны:пык V_AMNY  "" ;
пымалыштны:пымавыш V_JUAYSHNY  "" ;
пырӧтлыны:пырӧтлы V_LYDDJYNY  "" ;
пӧліньтчыштны:пӧвиньччыш V_JUAYSHNY  "" ;
рудзавлыны:рудзаввы V_LYDDJYNY  "" ;
рудзалыштны:рудзавыш V_JUAYSHNY  "" ;
садьтӧмсявны:садьтӧмся V_NUAVNY  "" ;
саймыштны:саймышт V_KUTNY  "" ;
сапкисьны:сапкись V_ARTASJNY  "" ;
сибдалыштны:сибдаыш V_JUAYSHNY  "" ;
сины:си V_SHUNY  "" ;
соравлыны:сораллы V_LYDDJYNY  "" ;
сорлавны:сорвав V_AMNY  "" ;
сулӧтлыштны:суӧтвыш V_JUAYSHNY  "" ;
сынасьны:сынась V_ARTASJNY  "" ;
сьӧкмывны:сьӧкмы V_NUAVNY  "" ;
сэтӧравлыны:сэтӧраллы V_LYDDJYNY  "" ;
сюйны:сю V_KYJNY  "" ;
сяркнитны:сяркнит V_KUTNY  "" ;
сёйны:сё V_KYJNY  "" ;
таралыштны:тараыш V_JUAYSHNY  "" ;
тойны:то V_KYJNY  "" ;
томмывлыштны:томмыввыш V_AMNY  "" ;
трингыны:трингы V_LYDDJYNY  "" ;
туйны:ту V_KYJNY  "" ;
тучкыштны:тучкышт V_KUTNY  "" ;
туялыштны:туяыш V_JUAYSHNY  "" ;
тшакьявны:тшакья V_NUAVNY  "" ;
тюкны:тюк V_AMNY  "" ;
тӧвзьывлыны:тӧвзьывлы V_LYDDJYNY  "" ;
узьны:узь V_ARTASJNY  "" ;
уйны:у V_KYJNY  "" ;
чавмыштны:чалмыш V_JUAYSHNY  "" ;
чажӧтыштлыны:чажӧтыштлы V_LYDDJYNY  "" ;
чаллясялыштны:чаллясялышт V_KUTNY  "" ;
чатыртчывны:чатыртчы V_NUAVNY  "" ;
чеглалӧв-керны:чегваӧв-кер V_AMNY  "" ;
чивӧстны:чилӧс V_CHILOESNY  "" ;
чивӧстны:чиӧс V_CHILOESNY  "" ;
чочкомсялыштны:чочкомсявыш V_JUAYSHNY  "" ;
шагняссьыны:шагняссьы V_LYDDJYNY  "" ;
шайтны:шайт V_KUTNY  "" ;
шедтіcьны:шедтіcь V_ARTASJNY  "" ;
шогавны:шога V_NUAVNY  "" ;
шуны:шу V_SHUNY  "" ;
шуралыштны:шуравыш V_JUAYSHNY  "" ;
шывгыны:шывгы V_LYDDJYNY  "" ;
ылӧстны:ылӧст V_KUTNY  "" ;
югйӧв-керны:югйӧл-кер V_AMNY  "" ;
юны:ю V_SHUNY  "" ;
ёткӧпавны:ёткӧпа V_NUAVNY  "" ;
ӧнмӧссьыны:ӧнмӧссьы V_LYDDJYNY  "" ;
